New York, session 2025-2026, A3890.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1210-b to read as follows: 3 § 1210-b. Disability benefit for employees. 1. As used in this 4 section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 5 a. "Authority" shall mean the New York city transit authority and any 6 of its subsidiary corporations, including the Manhattan and Bronx 7 surface operating authority. 8 b. "Employee" shall mean any officer or employee of the authority. 9 2. Any employee of the authority who, after the effective date of this 10 section, sustains an injury for which such employee is determined to be 11 eligible for workers' compensation benefits as a result of an assault 12 sustained in the course of such employee's employment shall be entitled, 13 in addition to any workers' compensation payment and any other benefit 14 received by the employee owing to such disability whether pursuant to 15 law or contract, to a disability benefit payment equal to one-half of 16 the weekly workers' compensation payment, excluding schedule awards that 17 the employee receives for the same disability. Such disability payment 18 shall be made by the authority bi-weekly and shall continue for so long 19 as the employee receives a workers' compensation payment for the same 20 disability. The benefits provided for in this section shall not be 21 deemed to offset or reduce any other payment to which the employee is 22 otherwise entitled. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08177-01-5